sk-SK: Materiál membrány reproduktora: Hliník; Uhlíkové vlákno; Kompozit; Sklolaminát; Kevlarové/aramidové vlákno; Polypropylén s prímesou sľudy; Papier; Polypropylén (PP); Lisovaný papier; Titán; Iné
hu: Hangszórókúp anyaga: Alumínium; Szénszál; Kompozit; Üvegszál; Kevlár/aramidszál; Csillámmal injektált polipropilén; Papír; Polipropilén (PP); Préselt papír; Titán; Egyéb
nb: Høyttalerkjegle-materiale: Aluminium; Karbonfiber; Kompositt; Glassfiber; Kevlar / aramidfiber; Glimmerinjisert polypropylen; Papir; Polypropylen (PP); Presset papir; Titan; Annet
pt-BR: Alto-falante cone material: Alumínio; Fibra de carbono; Material composto; Fibra de vidro; Kevlar/Fibra de aramida; Polipropileno injetado com mica; Papel; Polipropileno (PP); Papel prensado; Titânio; Outros
lt-LT: Garsiakalbio kūgio medžiaga: Aliuminis; Anglies pluoštas; Kompozitas; Stiklo pluoštas; Kevlaras / aramido pluoštas; Žėručiu sustiprintas polipropilenas; Popierius; Polipropilenas (PP); Presuotas popierius; Titanas; Kita
ja: スピーカーコーン素材: アルミニウム; カーボンファイバー; コンポジット; グラスファイバー; ケブラー/アラミド繊維; マイカインジェクションポリプロピレン; ペーパー; ポリプロピレン (PP); プレスペーパー; チタン; その他
sl-SI: Material membrane zvočnika: Aluminij; Ogljikova vlakna; Kompozit; Steklena vlakna; Kevlar/aramidna vlakna; Polipropilen z brizgano sljudo; Papir; Polipropilen (PP); Stisnjen papir; Titan; Drugo
sv: Högtalarkon – material: Aluminium; Kolfiber; Komposit; Glasfiber; Kevlar/aramidfiber; Glimmerinjicerad polypropen; Papper; Polypropen (PP); Pressat papper; Titan; Annat
da: Højttalerkeglemateriale: Aluminium; Kulfiber; Komposit; Glasfiber; Kevlar-/aramidfiber; Glimmerinjiceret polypropylen; Papir; Polypropylen (PP); Presset papir; Titanium; Andet
fi: Kaiutinkartioiden materiaali: Alumiini; Hiilikuitu; Komposiitti; Lasikuitu; Kevlar-/aramidikuitu; Kiilleruiskuvalettu polypropeeni; Paperi; Polypropeeni (PP); Puristettu paperi; Titaani; Muu
th: วัสดุของกรวยลำโพง: อะลูมิเนียม; คาร์บอนไฟเบอร์; คอมโพสิต; ไฟเบอร์กลาส; เส้นใยเคฟลาร์/อะรามิด; โพลิโพรพิลีนผสมไมกา; กระดาษ; โพลิโพรพิลีน (PP); กระดาษอัด; ไทเทเนียม; อื่นๆ
nl: Luidsprekerconus materiaal: Aluminium; Koolstofvezel; Composiet; Glasvezel; Kevlar/aramidevezel; Mica-geïnjecteerd polypropyleen; Papier; Polypropyleen (PP); Geperst papier; Titanium; Overige
ko: 스피커 콘 소재: 알루미늄; 탄소 섬유; 복합재; 유리 섬유; 케블라/아라미드 섬유; 마이카 사출 폴리프로필렌; 종이; 폴리프로필렌(PP); 압착 종이; 티타늄; 기타
tr: Hoparlör koni malzemesi: Alüminyum; Karbon fiber; Kompozit; Fiberglas; Kevlar/Aramid fiber; Mika enjeksiyonlu polipropilen; Kağıt; Polipropilen (PP); Sıkıştırılmış kağıt; Titanyum; Diğer
fr: Matériau du cône de haut-parleur: Aluminium; Fibre de carbone; Composite; Fibre de verre; Kevlar / Fibre d’aramide; Polypropylène (PP) injecté de mica; Papier; Polypropylène (PP); Papier pressé; Titane; Autre
it: Materiale del cono dell'altoparlante: Alluminio; Fibra di carbonio; Composito; Fibra di vetro; Fibra di Kevlar/aramidica; Polipropilene iniettato di mica; Carta; Polipropilene (PP); Carta pressata; Titanio; Altro
el: Υλικό κώνου ηχείου: Αλουμίνιο; Ανθρακόνημα; Σύνθετο υλικό; Υαλοβάμβακας; Kevlar/Ίνες αραμιδίου; Πολυπροπυλένιο ενισχυμένο με μίκα; Χαρτί; Πολυπροπυλένιο (PP); Πεπιεσμένο χαρτί; Τιτάνιο; Άλλο
bg-BG: Материал на мембраната на високоговорителя: Алуминий; Въглеродни влакна; Композитен материал; Фибростъкло; Кевлар/арамидни влакна; Полипропилен, инжектиран със слюда; Хартия; Полипропилен (PP); Пресована хартия; Титан; Друго
ro-RO: Materialul conului difuzorului: Aluminiu; Fibră de carbon; Compozit; Fibră de sticlă; Kevlar/Fibră de aramidă; Polipropilenă (PP) injectată cu mică; Hârtie; Polipropilenă (PP); Hârtie presată; Titan; Altele
pl: Materiał membrany głośnika: Aluminium; Włókno węglowe; Kompozyt; Włókno szklane; Kevlar / włókno aramidowe; Polipropylen (PP) z miką; Papier; Polipropylen (PP); Prasowany papier; Tytan; Inne
zh-CN: 扬声器锥盆材料: 铝制; 碳纤维; 复合材料; 玻璃纤维; 凯夫拉/芳纶纤维; 云母注塑聚丙烯; 纸质; 聚丙烯 (PP); 压制纸质; 钛制; 其他
es: Material del cono del altavoz: Aluminio; Fibra de carbono; Compuesto; Fibra de vidrio; Kevlar/fibra de aramida; Polipropileno inyectado con mica; Papel; Polipropileno (PP); Papel prensado; Titanio; Otro
zh-TW: 揚聲器音盆材質: 鋁; 碳纖維; 複合材質; 玻璃纖維; 克維拉/芳綸纖維; 雲母注塑聚丙烯; 紙; 聚丙烯 (PP); 壓製紙; 鈦金屬; 其他
ru: Материал диффузора динамика: Алюминий; Углеродное волокно; Композит; Стекловолокно; Кевлар / арамидное волокно; Полипропилен с добавлением слюды; Бумага; Полипропилен (ПП); Прессованная бумага; Титан; Другое
en: Speaker cone material: Aluminum; Carbon fiber; Composite; Fiberglass; Kevlar/Aramid fiber; Mica-injected polypropylene; Paper; Polypropylene (PP); Pressed paper; Titanium; Other
hr-HR: Materijal membrane zvučnika: Aluminij; Ugljična vlakna; Kompozit; Stakloplastika; Kevlar / aramidna vlakna; Polipropilen s tinjcem; Papir; Polipropilen (PP); Prešani papir; Titanij; Ostalo
pt-PT: Material do cone do altifalante: Alumínio; Fibra de carbono; Composto; Fibra de vidro; Fibra de Kevlar/aramida; Polipropileno injetado com mica; Papel; Polipropileno (PP); Papel prensado; Titânio; Outro
vi: Vật liệu nón loa: Nhôm; Sợi carbon; Composite; Sợi thủy tinh; Sợi Kevlar/Aramid; Polypropylene bơm mica; Giấy; Polypropylene (PP); Giấy ép; Titan; Khác
de: Material der Lautsprechermembran: Aluminium; Carbonfaser; Verbundwerkstoff; Glasfaser; Kevlar/Aramidfaser; Glimmerverstärktes Polypropylen; Papier; Polypropylen (PP); Gepresstes Papier; Titan; Sonstige
cs: Materiál membrány reproduktoru: Hliník; Uhlíkové vlákno; Kompozit; Sklolaminát; Kevlarové/aramidové vlákno; Polypropylen plněný slídou; Papír; Polypropylen (PP); Lisovaný papír; Titan; Jiné